Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIV Descent, Wills, and Administration of Decedents’ Estates
CHAPTER 395 Personal Representatives
395.400.
Functions of public administrator and sheriff.

The public administrator and guardian or sheriff shall, by virtue of his office and the order of court, be the administrator or administrator de bonis non, or if there is a will, administrator with the will annexed, and shall have all the rights and powers and be subjected to the same liabilities and be governed by the same laws prescribed for administrators and guardians. If the sheriff is acting, his powers, rights, duties and liabilities shall not expire with his office of sheriff. The court may, however, at any time, set aside the order entrusting the estate to the public administrator and guardian or sheriff and allow an executor or administrator to qualify.

History.

3906, 3908.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The surety bond of a sheriff who was in office at the time of his appointment as administrator does not expire with his term because his statutory duties and liabilities are specifically extended by statute.

OAG 63-599

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Department of Law, Law Enforcement in Kentucky, 52 Ky. L.J. 1 (1963).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Complaint by Corporation as Public Administrator, Form 234.17.

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Order Confiding Estate to Public Administrator, Form 234.07.

395.410.
Curator — Grounds for appointment — Bond.

During the contest about the probate of a will, or when the court for any valid cause is delayed in granting letters testamentary or administration, it may appoint a curator to collect and preserve the estate of the decedent until probate of the will is granted, or until the cause for which the order was made is removed.

When any resident of this state or person owning property in this state has been absent from his last known place of residence for a period of one (1) year and is not known to have been living during that time, the District Court of any county in which a personal representative could be appointed for that person’s estate if deceased, may appoint a curator to collect and preserve the estate of that absent person.

The court shall take bond with good surety from the person appointed curator for the full and faithful performance of the trust confided in him.

History.

3901, 3902a-1: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 389, effective January 2, 1978.

395.420.
Functions of curator.

A curator appointed under subsection (1) of KRS

395.410

shall collect and safely keep the estate of the decedent, and make and return to court, within sixty (60) days, a full and complete inventory of the estate and deliver up the estate, when required, to the executor or administrator. He may pay debts, sue and be sued and sell perishable and other goods.

A curator appointed under subsection (2) of KRS

395.410

shall collect and safely keep the estate of an absent person; make and return to the court, within sixty (60) days, a full and complete inventory of the estate and deliver up the estate, including the income from the estate, when required, to the absent person upon his return, or to the executor or administrator, when one is appointed. He may pay debts, sue and be sued, invest or reinvest any funds coming into his hands and sell perishable and other goods.

History.

3902, 3902a-4: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 218, § 22; 1980, ch. 259, § 23, effective July 15, 1980.

395.430.
Application for curator for absent person — Notice.

Before any curator is appointed for an absent person under subsection (2) of KRS

395.410

, a written application requesting the appointment shall be filed with the District Court Clerk. The application shall be verified and shall recite the fact of absence, the last known address of the absent person and the presence of property within this state or other ground requiring the appointment of a curator for the protection of the property or rights of the absent person. The application may be made by any relative, creditor or debtor of the absent person, or by any person in possession of or interested in any property or rights of the absent person.

Upon the filing with the District Court Clerk of any such application, the clerk shall send by United States certified mail, return receipt requested a letter addressed to the absent person at the last known address as given in the application, stating that such application has been filed. The clerk shall publish pursuant to KRS Chapter 424 a notice to the effect that an application for the appointment of a curator has been made.

History.

3902a-2, 3902a-3: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 224; 1974, ch. 315, § 85; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 390, effective January 2, 1978; 1980, ch. 114, § 103, effective July 15, 1980.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Death presumed after person has been absent for seven years, KRS

422.130

.

395.440.
Appeal from order appointing curator.

An appeal from an order appointing a curator to collect and preserve the estate of an absent person may be taken as in the case of an administrator.

An appeal from any order appointing a curator under KRS

395.410

shall not suspend the powers of the curator.

History.

3901, 3902a-1.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Appeal to Circuit Court from order admitting will to record, KRS

394.250

.

395.450.
Jurisdiction to dispense with administration.

The District Court that has jurisdiction to grant administration of the estate of a person dying intestate shall have jurisdiction of proceedings to dispense with administration.

History.

3897-6: amend. Acts 1968, ch. 200, § 8; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 391, effective January 2, 1978.

395.455.
Transfer of assets without administration.

Where the exemption of the surviving spouse alone, or together with preferred claims paid by a widow or by the widower where the wife’s estate is legally liable for payment, equals or exceeds the amount of probatable assets, the court may order that administration of the estate be dispensed with and such assets be transferred to the surviving spouse or to a person designated by such surviving spouse to receive all or part of such assets. The court may so order in both testate and intestate estates and without requiring the renunciation of a will or the giving of bond.

If the court is satisfied that no probatable estate will pass through the hands of the personal representative, it may order that no letters of administration be issued and in the case of a testate estate that the will be probated only.

Where a surviving spouse has waived his or her right to the exemption accorded by law in favor of a person who has paid preferred claims in an amount equalling or exceeding the amount of probatable assets or who is legally entitled to such payment, or where there is no surviving spouse and such person has made such payment or is legally entitled thereto, the court may order that the administration of the estate be dispensed with and such assets transferred to such person. The court may so order without requiring the giving of bond.

For purpose of this section, the exemption of the surviving spouse is such exemption as has been created by KRS

391.030

and preferred claims are those listed in KRS

396.095

and in the order thereof.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 299, § 10; 1982, ch. 277, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 1988, ch. 90, § 29, effective July 15, 1988.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Real or personal property held in joint tenancy with right of survivorship is not a “probatable asset” and decedent’s one half interest should not be listed on petition for letters of administration, on the inventory filed with the county court, or accounted for in the final settlement filed by the administrator or administratrix unless the personal representative is chargeable with the real estate under KRS

140.050

,

395.220

or

395.515

.

OAG 75-200

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Bratt, Family Protection Under Kentucky’s Inheritance Laws: Is the Family Really Protected? 76 Ky. L.J. 387 (1987-88).

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Schneider, Recommendations for Improving Kentucky’s Inheritance Laws, 22 N. Ky. L. Rev. 317 (1995).

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Probate Procedures Dispensing with Administration, § 232.00.

395.460.
Dispensing with administration of small estates. [Repealed.]

395.470.
Dispensing with administration by agreement.

Administration of the estate of a person dying intestate may be dispensed with by agreement if there are no debts owing by the estate; all persons beneficially entitled to the personal estate have agreed in writing that there shall be no administration; and either there are no claims or demands due the estate, or the written agreement to dispense with administration designates a trustee with power to collect claims and demands.

The written agreement provided in subsection (1) shall be acknowledged by the parties and filed in the District Court together with the motion of the parties for an order dispensing with administration. If the court is satisfied by affidavit or otherwise that the conditions prescribed in subsection (1) exist, it shall enter an order dispensing with administration. If the written agreement of the beneficiaries designates a trustee to collect claims or demands, the order shall confirm the designation and the person so designated shall have the same right to sue for and collect claims and demands that an administrator has.

The District Court shall be satisfied that provision has been made for the state inheritance tax and the United States estate tax.

The persons applying for an order dispensing with administration shall advertise for creditors of the intestate to appear and present their claims to some person at the county seat. The person and place shall be designated in the advertisement. The advertisement shall also give notice when, where and by whom the order dispensing with administration will be applied for. The advertisement shall be posted at the courthouse door for six (6) weeks, and published pursuant to KRS Chapter 424. The order dispensing with administration shall not be granted until the persons applying for the order file in the District Court the affidavit of one (1) of them showing that advertisement for creditors has been made.

The persons applying for the order dispensing with administration shall, before the order is entered, give bond with surety in the amount of the personal estate for the benefit of any creditors who, within six (6) months from the order dispensing with administration, appear and file their claims with the court clerk. This bond shall be approved by the District Court and shall run to the state for the benefit of those creditors and be conditioned to be void if none of them files his claim with the clerk within six (6) months from the date of the order dispensing with administration.

History.

3897-2: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 225; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 392, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 277, § 18, effective July 15, 1982.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Probate Procedures Dispensing with Administration, § 232.00.

395.480.
Consent of persons under disability.

If any person beneficially interested in an estate is not sui juris, consent for that person to the written agreement provided by subsection (1) of KRS

395.470

may be given by his guardian, curator or conservator. In the case of a prisoner otherwise sui juris, consent may be given by him personally instead of by his curator if it is acknowledged before the superintendent or keeper of the prison and the superintendent or keeper certifies that, in his opinion, the prisoner gave his consent freely. If any person not sui juris is beneficially interested, a trustee appointed under subsection (2) of KRS

395.470

to collect claims and demands shall not act until he has given bond to account for the share of that person and the bond has been approved by the District Court.

History.

3897-3: amend. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 393, effective January 2, 1978; 1982, ch. 141, § 110, effective July 1, 1982.

395.490.
Procedure when administration already granted.

If administration or letters testamentary have been granted before application for an order dispensing with administration, the court shall not make such an order except upon notice to the personal representative and opportunity for him to be heard, nor until the costs of the administration have been paid and the accounts of the personal representative settled. If the order is then entered, the administration or letters testamentary shall be ipso facto revoked.

History.

3897-5.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Probate Procedures Dispensing with Administration, § 232.00.

395.500.
Order may be set aside.

An order dispensing with administration pursuant to KRS

395.470

may be set aside at any time within one (1) year from the order dispensing with administration under KRS

395.470

upon motion of any person who satisfies the court by prima facie proof that he has a just and unsatisfied claim or demand against the estate.

History.

3897-4: amend. Acts 1982, ch. 277, § 19, effective July 15, 1982.

395.510.
Persons who may bring actions for settlement of estates — Parties.

A representative, legatee, distributee or creditor of a deceased person may bring an action in circuit court for the settlement of his estate provided that no such suit shall be brought by any of the parties named except the personal representative until the expiration of six (6) months after the qualification of such representative.

The representatives of the decedent, and all persons having a lien upon or an interest in the property left by the decedent, or any part thereof, and the creditors of the decedent, so far as known to the plaintiff, must be parties to the action as plaintiffs or defendants.

History.

C.C. 428: amend. Acts 1918, ch. 155; trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 394, effective January 2, 1978.

395.515.
Contents of petition, adjudication of rights of interested persons — Realty sold, when.

In such an action the petition must state the amount of the debts and the nature and value of the property, real and personal, of the decedent, so far as known to the plaintiff; if it appears that there is a genuine issue concerning the right of any creditor, beneficiary or heir-at-law to receive payment or distribution, or if it appears that there is a genuine issue as to what constitutes a correct and lawful settlement of the estate, or a correct and lawful distribution of the assets, such issues may be adjudicated by the court; and, if it shall appear that the personal estate is insufficient for the payment of all debts, the court may order the real property descended or devised to the heirs or devisees who may be parties to the action, or so much thereof as shall be necessary, to be sold for the payment of the residue of such debts.

History.

C. C. 429: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; amend. Acts 1964, ch. 105, § 1.

395.520.
Claims to be proved before commissioner — Notice to creditors.

In all actions the court shall make an order for the creditors of the decedent to appear before a commissioner, to be appointed by the court, and prove their claims before a certain day to be named in the order, notice of which shall be given by publication pursuant to KRS Ch. 424; and, by such other publication as the court directs.

History.

C. C. 430: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; amend. Acts 1966, ch. 239, § 226.

395.525.
Powers of clerk during vacation — Appearance before master commissioner — Notice. [Repealed.]

395.530.
Effect of creditor presenting claim.

A creditor appearing before the commissioner and presenting his claim becomes thereby a party to the action, and is concluded by the final judgment of the court allowing or rejecting his claim.

History.

C. C. 432: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.

395.535.
Effect of creditor failing to present claim — Liability of distributees.

Creditors failing to appear and prove their claims, pursuant to such order, shall have no claim against the executor or administrator who has actually paid out the estate in expenses of administration, and to creditors, legatees or distributees, and shall have no claim against the legatees or distributees.

History.

C. C. 433: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1; 1974, ch. 299, § 17.

395.540.
Liability of legatees and distributees to creditors. [Repealed.]

395.545.
Distributee or legatee may be required to give bond for payment of debts. [Repealed.]

395.550.
Creditors actions may be enjoined while action for settlement pending.

Upon the institution of the action mentioned in KRS

395.510

, an order may be made enjoining the prosecution of actions against the representatives of a decedent, by creditors, for their demands. But such enjoining shall not be made, unless the action for the settlement of the estate be commenced within three (3) years after the qualification of the personal representative.

History.

C. C. 436: trans. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 1, effective July 1, 1953.